New York, session 2025-2026, A8048.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. In order to improve quality and promote 2 access to team-based care, it is the policy of the state to encourage 3 HealthySteps implementation in pediatric practices for the purpose of 4 increasing access to evidenced-based screenings, health promotion and 5 prevention services, and connections to supports for the family. 6 § 2. Section 2807 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 7 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 8 22. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to 9 the contrary, and subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this 10 subdivision and to the availability of federal financial participation, 11 the commissioner shall establish or approve an add-on rate for pediatric 12 practices implementing the HealthySteps model, for the purposes of 13 advancing pediatric screenings, promotion of behavioral health, and 14 prevention and treatment of behavioral health issues in children. For 15 federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics, the Heal- 16 thySteps payment add-on shall be paid in addition to the health center's 17 prospective payment system rate or payments received under the ambulato- 18 ry patient group reimbursement methodology. Revenue from the add-on 19 shall be excluded from managed care visit and revenue reports and shall 20 not be considered in the calculation or determination of supplemental 21 wrap-around payments. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11507-07-6 A. 8048--A 2 1 (b) To be eligible for the rate add-on established or approved pursu- 2 ant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a pediatric practice that 3 implements HealthySteps shall be on track or meet HealthySteps specific 4 fidelity criteria. 5 (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall 6 have the following meanings: 7 (i) "Pediatric practice" means a clinic providing pediatric care, as 8 defined by section three thousand seventy-three of this chapter. 9 (ii) "HealthySteps model" means the nationally recognized model of 10 care that is organized into three tiers of service and eight core compo- 11 nents to help families in practices. Services can be offered to chil- 12 dren ages birth up to their sixth birthday aligned with their needs. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027. Effective immediately, 14 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 15 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 16 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.